Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-217
School land within defense project; purchase by United States.

The United States of America may purchase any educational lands located within the boundaries of any defense project.

Laws 1943, c. 160, § 1, p. 573;

R.S.1943, § 72-217.

Legislature provided for a public offering, preceded by public notice, of all educational lands subject to lease. State v. Platte Valley P. P. & I. Dist., 147 Neb. 289, 23 N.W.2d 300 (1946).